Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.800

Oversight, consolidation, and standardization—Review.

The department must conduct a review of statutes for all health care facility types licensed by the department under chapters 18.46, 18.64, 70.41, 70.42, 70.127, 70.230, 71.12, and 71.24 RCW to evaluate appropriate levels of oversight and identify opportunities to consolidate and standardize licensing and enforcement requirements across facility types. The department must work with stakeholders including, but not limited to, the statewide associations of the facilities under review to create recommendations that will be shared with stakeholders and the legislature for a uniform health care facility enforcement act for consideration in the 2021 legislative session.

[ 2020 c 115 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2020 c 115: See notes following RCW 71.12.700.